Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1058.
do enact as follows:AB1058,11Section 1. 704.085 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1058,2,82704.085 (1) (a) Except as provided under par. (b) pars. (b) and (c), a landlord 3may require a prospective tenant to pay the landlord’s actual cost, up to $25, to 4obtain a consumer credit report on the prospective tenant from a consumer credit 5reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide 6basis. The landlord shall notify the prospective tenant of the charge before 7requesting the consumer credit report, and shall provide the prospective tenant 8with a copy of the report.AB1058,29Section 2. 704.085 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB1058,2,1710704.085 (1) (c) A landlord may not require that a prospective tenant allow the 11landlord to obtain access to information regarding the prospective tenant’s credit 12score or consumer credit report regarding the prospective tenant. A landlord shall 13inform a prospective tenant that the tenant has the right to decline to allow the 14landlord access to information regarding the prospective tenant’s credit score and 15consumer credit report, and if the prospective tenant declines to provide access to 16the information, the landlord shall provide to the prospective tenant an alternative 17method of screening the prospective tenant’s ability to pay future rent.AB1058,2,1818